Washington statutes.
RCW 18.320.010

Representation as social worker.

(1) To address the goal of safeguarding Washington residents from the unqualified or improper practice of social work, a person may not represent himself or herself as a social worker unless qualified as a social worker as defined in this section.

(2) For purposes of this section, "social worker" means a person who meets one of the following qualifications:

(a) Is licensed under RCW 18.225.090(1)(a) or 18.225.145(1)(a); or

(b) Has graduated with at least a bachelor's degree from a social work educational program accredited by the council on social work education.

(3) A public agency or private entity doing business in Washington may not use the title of social worker, or a form of the title, for describing or designating volunteer or employment positions or within contracts for services, reference materials, manuals, or other documents, unless the volunteers or employees working in those positions are qualified as a social worker as defined in this section.

(4) This section does not apply to:

(a) Persons employed in Washington on January 1, 2012, under the job title of social worker so long as the person continues to be employed by the same agency as on January 1, 2012;

(b) Persons employed by the state of Washington on January 1, 2012, under the job title of social worker so long as the person continues to be employed by the state and who shall continue to have the same layoff, reversion, transfer, and promotional opportunities as were available to the employee on January 1, 2012;

(c) Individuals employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States; or

(d) Persons providing services as an educational staff associate who are certified by the Washington professional educator standards board. However, this section applies to a certified educational staff associate providing services outside the school setting.

(5) As used in subsection (4) of this section, "agency" means any private employer or any agency of state government.

[ 2011 c 89 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 89: See note following RCW 18.320.005.